th: จุดเน้นการฝึกคริกเก็ต: ตีลูก; โยนลูก; รับลูก; ความฟิตและปรับสภาพร่างกาย; การเคลื่อนไหวเท้า; ความแข็งแรงในการจับ; การประสานสายตากับมือ; โยนลูกหมุน; โยนลูกสวิง; รักษาประตู; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 板球訓練重點: 擊球; 投球; 守備; 體能與調節; 步法; 握力; 手眼協調; 旋轉投球; 擺動投球; 捕手防守; 其他
pl: Zakres treningu krykieta: Odbijanie; Rzucanie; Gra w polu; Kondycja i wytrzymałość; Praca nóg; Siła chwytu; Koordynacja wzrokowo-ruchowa; Rzuty podkręcone; Rzuty z rotacją (swing); Obrona bramki; Inne
zh-CN: 板球训练重点: 击球; 投球; 守备; 体能和调节; 步法; 握力; 手眼协调; 旋转投球; 摆动投球; 守门; 其他
ko: 크리켓 훈련 핵심 영역: 배팅; 볼링; 수비; 피트니스 및 컨디셔닝; 풋워크; 악력; 손과 눈의 협응력; 스핀 볼링; 스윙 볼링; 위켓키핑; 기타
fi: Kriketin harjoittelufokus: Lyönti; Syöttö; Ulkopeli; Kunto ja fysiikka; Jalkatyö; Puristusvoima; Silmän ja käden koordinaatio; Kierresyöttö; Kaarresyöttö; Hilanvartiointi; Muu
ro-RO: Obiectivul antrenamentului de cricket: Batting; Bowling; Fielding; Fitness și condiționare; Joc de picioare; Forța prizei; Coordonare ochi-mână; Spin bowling; Swing bowling; Wicket-keeping; Altele
hr-HR: Fokus za vježbanje za kriket: Udaranje; Bacanje; Hvatanje; Kondicija i snaga; Rad nogu; Snaga hvata; Koordinacija ruku i očiju; Spin bacanje; Swing bacanje; Wicket-keeping; Ostalo
cs: Zaměření tréninku kriketu: Pálkování; Nadhazování; Hra v poli; Kondice a posilování; Práce nohou; Síla úchopu; Koordinace ruky a oka; Nadhozy s rotací; Swingové nadhozy; Wicket-keeping; Ostatní
bg-BG: Тренировъчен фокус по крикет: Батиране; Боулинг; Фийлдинг; Фитнес и кондиция; Работа с крака; Сила на захвата; Координация между очите и ръцете; Спин боулинг; Суинг боулинг; Уикеткипинг; Други
it: Focus dell'allenamento da cricket: Battuta; Lancio; Difesa; Fitness e condizionamento; Gioco di gambe; Forza della presa; Coordinazione occhio-mano; Lancio spin; Lancio swing; Wicket-keeping; Altro
en: Cricket training focus: Batting; Bowling; Fielding; Fitness and conditioning; Footwork; Grip strength; Hand-eye coordination; Spin bowling; Swing bowling; Wicket keeping; Other
fr: Les points forts de l'entraînement au cricket: Frappe; Lancer; Chasse; Conditionnement physique; Jeu de jambes; Force de préhension; Coordination œil-main; Lancer à effet; Lancer de balle oscillante; Garde de guichet; Autre
lt-LT: Kriketo treniruočių fokusas: Atmušimas; Metimas; Lauko gynyba; Fizinis pasirengimas; Kojų darbas; Sukibimo jėga; Rankų ir akių koordinacija; Suktų kamuolių metimas; Svyruojančių kamuolių metimas; Vartų saugojimas; Kita
pt-PT: Objetivo do treino de críquete: Batimento; Lançamento; Defesa; Fitness e condicionamento; Jogo de pés; Força de preensão; Coordenação óculo-manual; Lançamento com efeito; Lançamento em curva; Guarda-postigo; Outro
es: Foco de entrenamiento de críquet: Bateo; Lanzamiento; Fildeo; Forma física y acondicionamiento; Juego de pies; Fuerza de agarre; Coordinación mano-ojo; Lanzamiento con efecto; Lanzamiento curvo; Wicket keeping; Otro
tr: Kriket antrenman odağı: Vuruş; Atış; Saha savunması; Kondisyon ve zindelik; Ayak çalışması; Kavrama gücü; El-göz koordinasyonu; Spin atış; Swing atış; Wicket koruyuculuğu; Diğer
da: Fokus på crickettræning: Slagspil; Kast; Markspil; Form og kondition; Fodarbejde; Grebsstyrke; Hånd-øje-koordination; Spinkast; Swingkast; Wicket-keeping; Andet
de: Schwerpunkt des Cricket-Trainings: Batting; Bowling; Fielding; Fitness und Kondition; Beinarbeit; Griffkraft; Hand-Auge-Koordination; Spin-Bowling; Swing-Bowling; Wicketkeeping; Sonstige
sl-SI: Fokus treninga kriketa: Odbijanje; Metanje; Igra v polju; Kondicija in telesna pripravljenost; Delo nog; Moč oprijema; Koordinacija med rokami in očmi; Rotacijski met; Nihajni met; Branjenje vratc; Drugo
ja: クリケットトレーニングフォーカス: バッティング; ボウリング; フィールディング; フィットネスとコンディショニング; フットワーク; 握力; 手と目の協調性; スピンボウリング; スウィングボウリング; ウィケットキーピング; その他
el: Εστίαση προπόνησης κρίκετ: Χτύπημα; Ρίψη; Άμυνα; Φυσική κατάσταση και ενδυνάμωση; Κίνηση ποδιών; Δύναμη λαβής; Συντονισμός χεριού-ματιού; Ρίψη spin; Ρίψη swing; Φύλακας; Άλλο
hu: Krikett edzési fókusz: Ütés; Dobás; Mezőnyjáték; Erőnlét és kondicionálás; Lábmunka; Fogáserősség; Szem-kéz koordináció; Csavart dobás; Íves dobás; Kapusjáték; Egyéb
sk-SK: Tréningové zameranie na kriket: Pálkovanie; Nadzhadzovanie; Hra v poli; Fitness a kondícia; Práca nôh; Sila úchopu; Koordinácia očí a rúk; Spin bowling; Swing bowling; Wicket keeping; Iné
nb: Fokus for crickettrening: Slag; Kasting; Utespill; Kondisjon og styrke; Fotarbeid; Grepstyrke; Hånd-øye-koordinasjon; Skrukasting; Skrukasting; Wicket-keeping; Annet
ru: Фокус тренировки по крикету: Бэттинг; Боулинг; Филдинг; Фитнес и физическая подготовка; Работа ног; Сила хвата; Зрительно-моторная координация; Спин-боулинг; Свинг-боулинг; Уикет-кипинг; Другое
pt-BR: Foco de treinamento de críquete: Rebatida; Arremesso; Defesa; Preparo e condicionamento físico; Trabalho de pés; Força de pegada; Coordenação motora visual; Arremesso com efeito (spin); Arremesso com curva (swing); Wicket-keeping; Outro
nl: Trainingsfocus cricket: Batten; Bowlen; Fielden; Fitness en conditie; Voetenwerk; Grijpkracht; Hand-oogcoördinatie; Spinbowlen; Swingbowlen; Wicketkeepen; Overig
vi: Trọng tâm huấn luyện môn Cricket: Đánh bóng; Ném bóng; Bắt bóng; Thể hình và rèn luyện; Động tác chân; Lực nắm; Phối hợp tay - mắt; Ném bóng xoáy; Ném bóng lượn; Bắt bóng sau cầu môn; Khác
sv: Träning för cricket: Slagning; Kastning; Utespel; Fys och kondition; Fotarbete; Greppstyrka; Öga-hand-koordination; Spinnkastning; Swingkastning; Grindvaktsspel; Övrigt